Massachusetts, session 194th, H3097.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 1 of chapter 64H of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022
Official Edition, is hereby amended by inserting after the word “services.” in line 283 the
following new sentence: --
In the case of the sale by a vendor of a mobile telecommunications device with mobile
telecommunications services, the tax shall be imposed upon the sales price of the mobile
telecommunications device.
of 1